Maryland, session 2026, HB0173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–325 and 7–326 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–326.1 and 7–325, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–326.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0173*

HOUSE BILL 173
THE NATURAL HISTORY SOCIETY OF MARYLAND IS THE STATE NATURAL
SCIENCE MUSEUM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.